Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-109
Board; annual register; contents; personnel;
executive director; duties.

(1) In December of each year,
the board shall make
available for public distribution an annual register containing
the names, arranged alphabetically by classifications, of all persons holding
permits, the names of the members of the board, and such other matters as
may be deemed proper by the board. The register
shall be made available to each permitholder.

(2) The board shall employ an executive director, additional personnel,
and any other assistance as it may require for the performance of its duties.
Unless otherwise directed by the board, the executive director shall keep
a record of all proceedings, transactions, and official acts of the board,
be custodian of all the records of the board, and perform such other duties
as the board may require.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 4, p. 57;

Laws 1981, LB 92, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1005, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 3.